Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 181A.855 is amended to read:
181A.855. (1) An applicant for certification as a private security professional:
(a) Must be:
(A) At least 18 years of age, if an applicant for certification as an unarmed private security
professional; or
(B) At least 21 years of age, if an applicant for certification as an armed private security pro-
fessional;
(b) Must have satisfactorily completed training requirements approved  by the Board on Public
Safety Standards and Training; and
(c) Must not be  required to register or be registered as a sex offender under ORS 163A.010,
163A.015, 163A.020 or 163A.025.
(2) An applicant meets the requirements of subsection (1)(b) of this section if the applicant  pro-
vides the Department of Public Safety Standards and Training with documentation of military
training or experience that the department determines is  substantially equivalent to the training
required by subsection (1)(b) of this section.
(3) The department, in consultation with the board, shall  adopt rules establishing a pro-
cedure for recognition of prior  law enforcement experience toward completion of the training
required under subsection (1)(b) of  this section. The rules must identify eligibility require-
ments for applicants, training that may be substituted with  prior experience under the pro-
cedure and requirements for demonstrating the knowledge or skills necessary  for
certification as a private security professional.
[(3)] (4) The department, in consultation with the board, shall adopt rules specifying  those
crimes for which a conviction requires the denial or revocation of certification as a  private security
professional or instructor.
Enrolled House Bill 2183 (HB 2183-A) Page 1
Passed by House April 10, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 6, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2183 (HB 2183-A) Page 2